Wyoming, session 2026, HB0037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 5-3-201, 7-4-101, 9-1-801, 18-3-101,
22-4-304(b), 22-5-203 by creating a new subsection (c),
22-5-215, 22-5-304(b), 22-6-117(a)(ix), 22-6-125(a) by
creating a new paragraph (vi) and by renumbering (vi)
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
through (xiv) as (vii) through (xv), 22-6-126 by creating a
new subsection (c) and 22-18-111(a)(ii) and (vi) are
amended to read:

5-3-201. Office created; term; election in counties
of first and second class; county clerk designated ex
officio clerk in other counties.

There shall be a clerk of the district court in each
organized county of the state whose term of office shall be
four (4) years and until his successor is elected and
qualified. The position of clerk of the district court
shall be nonpartisan. Clerks of the district court shall be
elected at general elections in counties of the first and
second class; and in all other counties the county clerk
shall be ex officio clerk of the district court, and shall
perform all of the duties pertaining to the office of clerk
of the district court.

7-4-101. Election; oath; bond.

A coroner shall be elected in each county for a term of
four (4) years. The position of coroner shall be
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
nonpartisan. He shall take the oath prescribed by the
constitution of the state and give bond to the state of
Wyoming, in the penal sum of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000.00), with a sufficient surety, to be approved by
the board of county commissioners, conditioned that he will
faithfully perform all duties required by law.

9-1-801. Office created; mandatory and permissive
establishment.

There shall be in each judicial district in which any one
(1) county has reached a population of sixty thousand
(60,000) or more the office of district attorney. In each
of the remaining judicial districts there shall be the
office of district attorney whenever a majority of the
county commissioners in each county within the judicial
district shall resolve that such an office of district
attorney should be created in that judicial district. The
position of district attorney shall be nonpartisan.

18-3-101. Nonpartisan county offices; time of
qualifying.

HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
(a) The offices of county clerk, county treasurer,
county assessor, county coroner, sheriff, county and
prosecuting attorney, district attorney and clerk of the
district court under this chapter shall be nonpartisan.

(b) All county officers elected at a general election
shall qualify and assume their offices on the first Monday
in January next following their election.

22-4-304. Certification of candidates; fees.

(b) The chairman and secretary of the state or county
political convention shall certify to the county clerk the
names of its party's nominees for elected county offices
and office of the district attorney commissioner.

22-5-203. Nonpartisan offices; separate ballot; same
time.

(c) Candidates for the nonpartisan positions of
county clerk, county treasurer, county assessor, county
coroner, sheriff, county and prosecuting attorney, district
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
attorney and clerk of the district court shall be nominated
only by nonpartisan primary election.

22-5-215. Nomination of partisan candidates and
write-in candidates, nonpartisan candidates.

(a) On each party ballot the candidate or candidates
equal in number to the number to be elected to each office
who receive the largest number of votes shall be nominated
and shall be entitled to have their names printed on the
ballot for the next general election. A write-in candidate
shall not be nominated and shall not be entitled to have
his name printed on the ballot for the next general
election unless he received at least twenty-five (25)
write-in votes in the primary election and is a registered
voter in the political party for which he was nominated on
the day of the primary election. An unsuccessful candidate
for office at a primary election whose name is printed on
any party ballot may not accept nomination for the same
office at the next general election.

(b) For nonpartisan candidates, the candidates equal
in number to (2) times the number to be elected to each
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
office that receive the largest number of votes shall be
entitled to have their names printed on the ballot for the
next general election. A write-in candidate shall not be
entitled to have his name printed on the ballot for the
next general election unless he received at least
twenty-five (25) write-in votes in the primary election.

22-5-304. Qualifications and number of signers
required.

(b) For a countywide partisan office county
commissioner, a petition shall be signed by registered
electors, resident in the county and eligible to vote for
the petitioner, numbering not less than two percent (2%) of
the total number of votes cast for representative in
congress in the last general election for the entire
county.

22-6-117. Order of listing offices in partisan
elections.

HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
(a) The major party primary and general partisan
election ballots shall contain the offices to be voted on
in the following order:

(ix) Candidates for county commissioner;,
coroner, district attorney, county attorney, sheriff,
clerk, treasurer, assessor, and clerk of the district
court;

22-6-125. Order of offices and ballot propositions on
nonpartisan ballots.

(a) The nonpartisan ballot shall contain the offices
and ballot propositions to be voted on in the following
order:

(vi) Candidates for the nonpartisan county
offices of county clerk, county treasurer, county assessor,
county coroner, sheriff, county and prosecuting attorney,
district attorney and clerk of the district court;

(vi)(vii) Candidates for municipal offices;

HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
(vii)(viii) Candidates for community college
trustees;

(viii)(ix) Candidates for school board trustees;

(ix)(x) Candidates for special district
directors;

(x)(xi) Candidates for other offices of county
subdivisions;

(xi)(xii) Constitutional amendments;

(xii)(xiii) Initiative propositions;

(xiii)(xiv) Referendum propositions;

(xiv)(xv) Other ballot propositions.

22-6-126. Form of nonpartisan ballots.

HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
(c) The official nonpartisan ballot for a general
election shall be printed in substantially the following
form:

(i) Across the top shall be printed "Official
Nonpartisan General Election Ballot";

(ii) On the first line shall be printed the name
of the county in which the ballot is used, the date of the
election and blank lines for entry of the election district
and precinct number;

(iii) Candidates for the different offices shall
be arranged in separate groups as provided by W.S.
22-6-119(a)(iv);

(iv) Except for justices of the supreme court,
judges of the district court, circuit court judges and
magistrates, below the list of candidates in each group
shall be printed blank lines for write-in candidates equal
in number to the number of persons to be elected;

HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
(v) Adjacent to the name of each candidate and
blank lines shall be printed a square for marking the vote.
No square shall appear at the top of a column;

(vi) Following each of the offices of justices
of the supreme court, judges of the district court, circuit
court judges and magistrates shall be printed: "Shall
Justice/Judge/Magistrate .... be retained in office?";

(vii) Following all offices shall be printed any
ballot proposition in accordance with W.S. 22-6-124.

22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.

(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress or the board of
trustees of a school or community college district, shall
be filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided
in this section, by appointment of a temporary successor.
The person appointed shall serve until a successor for the
remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next
general election and takes office on the first Monday of
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
the following January. Provided, if a vacancy in a four
(4) year term of office occurs in the term's second or
subsequent years after the first day for filing an
application for nomination pursuant to W.S. 22-5-209, no
election to fill the vacancy shall be held and the
temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder of
the unexpired term. The following apply:

(ii) If a vacancy occurs in a county elective
office, except as provided in W.S. 18-3-524, the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the vacancy
occurs shall immediately notify in writing the chairman of
the county central committee of the political party which
the last incumbent represented at the time of his election
under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his
appointment if not elected to office. The chairman shall
call a meeting of the county central committee to be held
not later than fifteen (15) days after he receives notice
of the vacancy. At the meeting the county central
committee shall select and transmit to the board of county
commissioners the names of three (3) persons qualified to
hold the office. Within five (5) days after receiving
these three (3) names, the board of county commissioners
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) of the
three (3) to hold the office. If the incumbent who has
vacated office did not represent a political party at the
time of his election, or at the time of his appointment if
not elected to office, the county commissioners shall
publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
and on the county website, notice that within fifteen (15)
days after publication any person qualified to hold the
office may make application directly to the county
commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy. Within
twenty (20) days after the publication of the vacancy in
office the county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by
appointment of one (1) person qualified to hold the office
from those submitting applications;

(vi) If the county commissioners fail to fill
any vacancy as required in this section within the time
specified, any person residing in the county or legislative
district who is qualified to hold the office may file a
petition with the clerk of the district court of the county
or legislative district in which the vacancy occurred
requesting the judge of the district court to fill the
vacancy. Within thirty (30) days after the petition is
HB0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0344
filed the judge shall fill the vacancy by appointing a
person residing in the county or legislative district
belonging to the same political party as the incumbent
represented at the time of his election under W.S.
22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not
elected to office, who is qualified to hold the office. If
the incumbent did not represent any political party at the
time of his election or at the time of his appointment if
not elected to office, the judge may appoint any person
residing in the county or legislative district who is
qualified to hold the office to fill the vacancy.

Section 2. W.S. 22-6-126(a) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0037